el: Μέθοδος προγραμματισμού συστήματος τηλεχειρισμού χωρίς κλειδί: Απαιτείται κλωνοποίηση/αντιγραφή; Απαιτείται προγραμματισμός από αντιπρόσωπο/κλειδαρά; Αντιστοίχιση με κουμπί εκμάθησης; Δεν απαιτείται; Απαιτείται εργαλείο OBD; Ενσωματωμένο/αυτοπρογραμματιζόμενο; Προ-προγραμματισμένο σε ECU/δέκτη; Προ-προγραμματισμένο σε VIN; Άλλο
it: Metodo di programmazione del sistema senza chiave a distanza: Clonazione/copia richiesta; Richiesta programmazione da concessionario/fabbro; Associazione con pulsante di apprendimento; Non richiesto; Strumento OBD richiesto; A bordo/autoprogrammabile; Pre-programmato su ECU/ricevitore; Pre-programmato su VIN; Altro
fr: Méthode de programmation du système d’accès sans clé à distance: Clonage/copie requise; Programmation par concessionnaire/serrurier requise; Appairage par bouton d’apprentissage; Non requis; Outil OBD requis; Embarqué/auto-programmable; Préprogrammé au calculateur/récepteur; Préprogrammé au VIN; Autre
lt-LT: Nuotolinės beraktės sistemos programavimo metodas: Būtina klonuoti / kopijuoti; Būtina programuoti pas atstovą / šaltkalvį; Susiejimas mokymo mygtuku; Nereikalaujama; Būtinas OBD įrankis; Programuojama sistemoje / savarankiškai; Iš anksto užprogramuota ECU / imtuvui; Iš anksto užprogramuota pagal VIN; Kitas
nl: Afstandsbediend keyless systeem programmeermethode: Klonen/kopiëren vereist; Programmering door dealer/slotenmaker vereist; Koppelen via leerknop; Niet vereist; OBD-tool vereist; Onboard/zelf programmeerbaar; Voorgeprogrammeerd op ECU/ontvanger; Voorgeprogrammeerd op VIN; Overig
pt-PT: Método de programação do sistema de chave remota: Requer clonagem/cópia; Requer programação por concessionário/serralheiro; Emparelhamento de botão de aprendizagem; Não requer; Requer ferramenta OBD; A bordo/autoprogramável; Pré-programado na ECU/recetor; Pré-programado no VIN; Outro
hu: Távoli kulcs nélküli rendszer programozási módja: Klónozást / másolást igényel; Márkaszerviz / lakatos általi programozást igényel; Betanítógombos párosítás; Nem szükséges; OBD eszköz szükséges; Fedélzeti / saját magad által programozható; Előre programozott az ECU-hoz/vevőhöz; Előre programozott az alvázszámhoz (VIN); Egyéb
pl: Metoda programowania zdalnego systemu bezkluczykowego: Wymagane klonowanie/kopiowanie; Wymagane programowanie u dealera/ślusarza; Parowanie za pomocą przycisku nauki; Niewymagane; Wymagane narzędzie OBD; Samoprogramowalne/wbudowane; Wstępnie zaprogramowane do ECU/odbiornika; Wstępnie zaprogramowane do VIN; Inne
vi: Phương pháp lập trình hệ thống điều khiển từ xa không cần chìa khóa: Cần sao chép; Cần đại lý/thợ khóa lập trình; Ghép nối bằng nút Learn; Không yêu cầu; Cần công cụ OBD; Có sẵn/Tự lập trình; Được lập trình sẵn với ECU/bộ thu; Được lập trình sẵn với VIN; Khác
en: Remote keyless system programming method: Cloning/copy required; Dealer/locksmith programming required; Learn button pairing; Not required; OBD tool required; Onboard/self-programmable; Pre-programmed to ECU/receiver; Pre-programmed to VIN; Other
zh-TW: 遙控免鑰匙系統程式設計方式: 需要克隆/複製; 需由經銷商/鎖匠設定; 學習按鈕配對; 不需要; 需要 OBD 工具; 車載/可自行設定; 已預先設定至 ECU/接收器; 已預先設定至 VIN; 其他
ko: 원격 키리스 시스템 프로그래밍 방법: 클로닝/복사 필요; 딜러/열쇠공 프로그래밍 필요; 학습 버튼 페어링; 필요 없음; OBD 도구 필요; 온보드/자체 프로그래밍 가능; ECU/수신기에 사전 프로그래밍됨; VIN에 사전 프로그래밍됨; 기타
zh-CN: 遥控钥匙系统编程方式: 需要克隆/复制; 需要经销商/锁匠进行编程; 学习按钮配对; 不需要; 需要 OBD 工具; 车载/可自行编程; 预先编程到 ECU/接收器; 预先编程到 VIN; 其他
pt-BR: Sistema remoto sem chave programação método: Requer clonagem/cópia; Requer programação por concessionária/chaveiro; Emparelhamento por botão de aprendizado; Não necessário; Requer ferramenta OBD; A bordo/autoprogramável; Pré-programado para a ECU/receptor; Pré-programado para o VIN; Outro
nb: Programmeringsmetode for fjernstyrt nøkkelfritt system: Kloning/kopiering kreves; Programmering hos forhandler/låsesmed kreves; Paring med læreknapp; Ikke påkrevd; OBD-verktøy kreves; Innebygd/selvprogrammerbar; Forhåndsprogrammert til ECU/mottaker; Forhåndsprogrammert til VIN; Annet
da: Programmeringsmetode for fjernbetjent nøglefrit system: Kloning/kopi påkrævet; Programmering via forhandler/låsesmed påkrævet; Parring via læreknap; Ikke påkrævet; OBD-værktøj påkrævet; Indbygget/selvprogrammerbar; Forprogrammeret til ECU/modtager; Forprogrammeret til VIN; Andet
es: Método de programación del sistema de acceso remoto sin llave: Requiere clonación/copia; Requiere programación de un concesionario/cerrajero; Emparejamiento con botón de aprendizaje; No se requiere; Requiere herramienta OBD; A bordo/autoprogramable; Preprogramado en la ECU/receptor; Preprogramado para el VIN; Otro
bg-BG: Метод за програмиране на система за безключов достъп: Изисква се клониране/копиране; Изисква се програмиране от дилър/ключар; Сдвояване чрез бутон за обучение; Не се изисква; Изисква се OBD инструмент; Вградено/възможност за самостоятелно програмиране; Предварително програмирано към ECU/приемник; Предварително програмирано към VIN; Други
th: วิธีการตั้งโปรแกรมระบบกุญแจรีโมทแบบไร้สาย: ต้องทำการโคลน/คัดลอก; ต้องโปรแกรมผ่านตัวแทนจำหน่าย/ช่างกุญแจ; จับคู่ผ่านปุ่ม Learn; ไม่จำเป็น; ต้องใช้เครื่องมือ OBD; โปรแกรมเองได้/โปรแกรมในตัว; โปรแกรมล่วงหน้าเข้ากับ ECU/เครื่องรับสัญญาณ; โปรแกรมล่วงหน้าเข้ากับ VIN; อื่นๆ
sv: Programmeringsmetod för fjärrstyrt nyckelfritt system: Kräver kloning/kopiering; Kräver programmering hos återförsäljare/låssmed; Parkoppling via inlärningsknapp; Krävs inte; Kräver OBD-verktyg; Självprogrammerbar; Förprogrammerad för ECU/mottagare; Förprogrammerad för chassinummer (VIN); Annat
ro-RO: Metoda de programare a sistemului fără cheie de la distanță: Necesită clonare/copiere; Necesită programare la dealer/lăcătuș; Asociere prin butonul de învățare; Nu este necesară; Necesită instrument OBD; Programabil la bord/de către utilizator; Preprogramat pentru ECU/receptor; Preprogramat pentru seria de șasiu (VIN); Altele
fi: Kauko-ohjattavan avaimettoman järjestelmän ohjelmointimenetelmä: Vaatii kloonauksen/kopioinnin; Vaatii ohjelmoinnin jälleenmyyjällä / lukkosepällä; Pariliitos oppimispainikkeella; Ei vaadita; Vaatii OBD-työkalun; Itse ohjelmoitavissa; Esiohjelmoitu ECUun/vastaanottimeen; Esiohjelmoitu VIN-koodiin; Muu
de: Programmiermethode für schlüssellose Fernzugangssysteme: Klonen/Kopieren erforderlich; Programmierung durch Händler/Schlüsseldienst erforderlich; Kopplung per Anlerntaste; Nicht erforderlich; OBD-Werkzeug erforderlich; Bordseitig/selbst programmierbar; Auf Steuergerät/Empfänger vorprogrammiert; Auf Fahrgestellnummer (VIN) vorprogrammiert; Sonstiges
ja: リモートキーレスシステムのプログラミング方法: クローニング/コピーが必要; ディーラー/鍵屋でのプログラミングが必要; 学習ボタンでのペアリング; 不要; OBD ツールが必要; 車載/自己プログラミング可能; ECU/レシーバーに事前プログラミング済み; VIN に事前プログラミング済み; その他
cs: Metoda programování dálkového bezklíčového systému: Vyžaduje naklonování/kopírování; Vyžaduje programování u dealera/zámečníka; Párování tlačítkem „Learn“; Nevyžaduje se; Vyžaduje nástroj OBD; Programovatelné přes vozidlo / uživatelem; Předprogramované pro řídicí jednotku (ECU) / přijímač; Předprogramované podle VIN; Jiné
tr: Uzaktan anahtarsız sistem programlama yöntemi: Klonlama/kopyalama gerekli; Bayi/çilingir programlaması gerekli; Öğrenme düğmesi ile eşleştirme; Gerekli değil; OBD aracı gerekli; Araç içi/kendi kendine programlanabilir; ECU/alıcıya önceden programlanmış; VIN'e önceden programlanmış; Diğer
hr-HR: Metoda programiranja daljinskog sustava bez ključa: Potrebno kloniranje/kopiranje; Potrebno programiranje kod trgovca / bravara; Uparivanje gumbom za učenje; Nije potrebno; Potreban OBD alat; Ugrađeno / samoprogramabilno; Unaprijed programirano za ECU/prijemnik; Unaprijed programirano za VIN; Ostalo
sk-SK: Metóda programovania diaľkového bezkľúčového systému: Vyžaduje sa klonovanie/kopírovanie; Vyžaduje sa programovanie u predajcu/zámočníka; Párovanie pomocou tlačidla Learn; Nevyžaduje sa; Vyžaduje sa diagnostika OBD; Programovateľné v aute/svojpomocne; Vopred naprogramované pre riadiacu jednotku/prijímač; Vopred naprogramované na VIN; Iné
sl-SI: Način programiranja sistema za daljinsko upravljanje brez ključa: Potrebno kloniranje/kopiranje; Potrebno programiranje pri prodajalcu/ključavničarju; Seznanjanje z gumbom za učenje; Ni potrebno; Potrebno orodje OBD; Vgrajeno / možnost samostojnega programiranja; Predprogramirano za ECU/sprejemnik; Predprogramirano za številko šasije (VIN); Drugo
ru: Способ программирования системы дистанционного бесключевого доступа: Требуется клонирование/копирование; Требуется программирование у дилера/слесаря; Сопряжение кнопкой обучения; Не требуется; Требуется инструмент OBD; Встроенное/самопрограммируемое; Предварительно запрограммирован на ЭБУ/приемник; Предварительно запрограммирован по VIN; Другое